New Jersey, session 221, A2226.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Office of Information Technology, in partnership with relevant Executive Branch offices, shall provide minimum information security standards and guidelines that Executive Branch departments, agencies, and other instrumentalities of the Executive Branch shall follow to protect against unauthorized access to, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information and information systems. 2.    A county, municipality, subdivision or instrumentality thereof shall: a.     follow the Office of Information Technologys minimum standards and guidelines for the protection against unauthorized access to, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information and information systems that are established for the Executive Branch, pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); or b.    ensure that its own standards and guidelines protecting against unauthorized access to, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information and information systems are commensurate with the informations sensitivity. 3.    A board of education shall: a.     follow the Office of Information Technologys minimum standards and guidelines for the protection against unauthorized access to, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information and information systems that are established for the Executive Branch, pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); or b.    ensure that its own standards and guidelines protecting against unauthorized access to, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information and information systems are commensurate with the informations sensitivity. 4.    The Administrative Director of the courts, as approved by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, is authorized and encouraged to: a.     ensure that courts in this State follow the Office of Information Technologys minimum standards and guidelines for the protection against unauthorized access to, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information and information systems that are established for the Executive Branch, pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); or b.    ensure that courts in this State have standards and guidelines to protect against unauthorized access to, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information and information systems commensurate with the informations sensitivity. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately, but shall remain inoperative for 180 days following the date of enactment.